Indiana, session 2026, SB211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-13-11-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.278-2019,
SECTION 162, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in
subsections (b) and (e) and section 3.5 of this chapter, after a vacancy
occurs and not later than ten (10) days after a vacancy occurs in an
office subject to this chapter, the county chairman:
(1) of the county in which the greatest percentage of the
population of the election district of the office is located; and
(2) of the same political party that elected or selected the official
who vacated the office;
shall give notice of a caucus to all eligible precinct committeemen.
(b) A county chairman may give notice of a caucus before the time
specified under subsection (a) if a vacancy will exist because the
official has:
(1) submitted a written resignation under IC 5-8-3.5;
(2) been elected to another office; or
(3) submitted a notice under IC 5-9-4 to take a leave of absence
SB 211—LS 6644/DI 149


for active duty in the armed forces or national guard.
(c) Notwithstanding IC 5-8-4, a person may not withdraw the
person's resignation after the resignation has been accepted by the
person authorized to accept the resignation less than seventy-two (72)
hours before the announced starting time of a caucus under this section.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) and section
sections 3.5 and 10(c) of this chapter, a caucus under this section shall
be held after giving notice to caucus members under section 4 of this
chapter and not later than thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs.
(e) If a vacancy exists in an office because of the death of the
officeholder, the caucus shall meet and select an individual to fill the
vacancy not later than thirty (30) days after the county chairman
receives notice of the death under IC 5-8-6. The county chairman shall
give notice to caucus members under section 4 of this chapter. The
county chairman may not give the notice required by section 4 of this
chapter until the county chairman receives notice of the death under
IC 5-8-6.
(f) If a person or entity that receives notice of a resignation under
IC 5-8-3.5-1(b) fails to provide timely notice of the resignation to the
person or entity with the power to fill the vacancy or call the caucus,
the person or entity with the power to fill the vacancy or call that
caucus:
(1) may immediately proceed to fill the vacancy or call the caucus
without prior receipt of the notice; and
(2) must do so not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the
notice from the person or entity that received the notice of
resignation.
SECTION 2. IC 3-13-11-3.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.119-2005,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) If a vacancy exists on a town council
because a circumstance has occurred under IC 36-5-2-6.5(3), except as
provided in section 10(c) of this chapter, the caucus shall meet and
select an individual to fill the vacancy not later than thirty (30) days
after the county chairman receives a notice of the vacancy under
IC 5-8-5.
(b) The county chairman shall:
(1) give notice of the caucus meeting to caucus members under
section 4 of this chapter; and
(2) keep the notice of the vacancy with the records of the caucus.
SECTION 3. IC 3-13-11-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The notice for a
caucus under section 3 of this chapter must:
SB 211—LS 6644/DI 149


(1) be in writing;
(2) state the name, address, electronic mail address, and
telephone number of the chairman of the caucus;
(3) state the purpose of the caucus;
(4) state the date, time, and place of the caucus; and
(5) be sent by first class mail to each member of the caucus at
least ten (10) days before the caucus.
SECTION 4. IC 3-13-11-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does
not apply to a vacancy filled by a county chairman under section 5(c)
of this chapter.
(b) A person who wishes to be a candidate for pro tempore
appointment to fill a vacancy under this chapter must file:
(1) a declaration of candidacy with:
(A) the chairman of the caucus; and or
(B) the circuit court clerk; and
(2) a statement of economic interests with the commission on
judicial qualifications if the vacancy is in the office of prosecuting
attorney;
at least seventy-two (72) hours before the time fixed for the caucus.
(c) A circuit court clerk who receives a declaration of candidacy
under subsection (b)(1)(B) shall send a copy of the filing to the
chairman of the caucus. The circuit court clerk must send the filing
to the chairman of the caucus on the same day it is received.
SECTION 5. IC 3-13-11-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.240-2025,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), the
members of a caucus held under this chapter shall select, by a majority
vote of those casting a vote for a candidate, a person to fill the vacancy
described in the written notice of the caucus.
(b) If more than one (1) person seeks to fill the vacancy, the
selection shall be conducted by secret ballot.
(c) The following apply if only one (1) person seeks to fill the
vacancy:
(1) The notice for a caucus sent under section 4 of this chapter
may be rescinded and the caucus is not required to meet.
(1) (2) A vote under subsection (a) is not required.
(2) (3) The county chairman may select that person to fill the
vacancy.
(d) If a notice is rescinded under subsection (c)(1), the chairman
of the caucus shall make a reasonable effort to notify the members
of the caucus that the meeting has been canceled.
SB 211—LS 6644/DI 149


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Elections, to which was
referred Senate Bill No. 211, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 2, between lines 39 and 40, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 3. IC 3-13-11-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does
not apply to a vacancy filled by a county chairman under section 5(c)
of this chapter.
(b) A person who wishes to be a candidate for pro tempore
appointment to fill a vacancy under this chapter must file:
(1) a declaration of candidacy with:
(A) the chairman of the caucus; and or
(B) the circuit court clerk; and
(2) a statement of economic interests with the commission on
judicial qualifications if the vacancy is in the office of prosecuting
attorney;
at least seventy-two (72) hours before the time fixed for the caucus.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 211 as introduced.)
GASKILL, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 2.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 211 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, between lines 39 and 40, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 3. IC 3-13-11-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The notice for a
caucus under section 3 of this chapter must:
(1) be in writing;
(2) state the name, address, electronic mail address, and
telephone number of the chairman of the caucus;
(3) state the purpose of the caucus;
SB 211—LS 6644/DI 149


(4) state the date, time, and place of the caucus; and
(5) be sent by first class mail to each member of the caucus at
least ten (10) days before the caucus.".
Page 3, between lines 10 and 11, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) A circuit court clerk who receives a declaration of
candidacy under subsection (b)(1)(B) shall send a copy of the filing
to the chairman of the caucus. The circuit court clerk must send
the filing to the chairman of the caucus on the same day it is
received.".
Page 3, after line 25, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(d) If a notice is rescinded under subsection (c)(1), the
chairman of the caucus shall make a reasonable effort to notify the
members of the caucus that the meeting has been canceled.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to SB 211 as printed January 13, 2026.)
GASKILL
SB 211—LS 6644/DI 149